Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1540.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 18, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-1821, to read: START_STATUTE13-1821. Theft of motor fuel; classification; definition A. A person commits theft of motor fuel if the person wilfully, knowingly and without AUTHORIZATION: 1. Breaches a retail fuel dispenser or accesses any internal portion of a retail fuel dispenser WITH ANY DEVICE THAT IS CONSTRUCTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF FRAUDULENTLY ALTERING, MANIPULATING OR INTERRUPTING THE NORMAL OPERATION OF A RETAIL FUEL DISPENSER. 2. Physically tampers with, manipulates, removes, replaces or interrupts any mechanical or electronic component that is located on the internal or external portion of a retail fuel dispenser. 3. Uses any form of electronic communication to fraudulently alter, manipulate or interrupt the normal operation of a retail fuel dispenser. B. A violation of subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section is a class 6 felony, except that if the violation results in a person obtaining more than fifty gallons of motor fuel it is a class 5 felony. C. A violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 or 3 of this section is a class 5 felony. D. For the purposes of this section, "motor fuel" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-5601.END_STATUTE